Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3515
Homestead; exemption; new owner of property; when claimed.

Any purchaser, new resident, or new owner of property must claim a homestead exemption as provided in section 77-3512 before the allowance to the owner on such property shall be lawful.

Laws 1979, LB 65, § 15;

Laws 1983, LB 195, § 8.